California, session 20252026, SB1348.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10110 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:10110. Every A person has an insurable interest in the life and health of:(a)Himself.(a) Themselves.(b) Any A person on whom he depends they depend wholly or in part for education or support.(c) Any A person under a legal obligation to him them for the payment of money or respecting property or services, of which death or illness might delay or prevent the performance.(d) Any A person upon whose life any an estate or interest vested in him them depends.